Washington statutes.
RCW 15.13.340

Late fee on delinquent assessments. (Effective until July 1, 2030.)

(1) A late fee of twenty percent of the amount due shall be levied on all delinquent assessments for each license period the assessment is delinquent.

(2) The director shall not issue a nursery dealer license or Christmas tree grower license to any applicant who has failed to pay any assessment due under the provisions of this chapter.

[ 2007 c 335 s 9; 2000 c 144 s 13; 1971 ex.s. c 33 s 10.]

NOTES:

Expiration date—2019 c 206; 2013 c 72; 2007 c 335: See note following RCW 15.13.250.

PDFRCW 15.13.340

Late fee on delinquent assessments. (Effective July 1, 2030.)

(1) A late fee of twenty percent of the amount due shall be levied on all delinquent assessments for each license period the assessment is delinquent.

(2) The director shall not issue a nursery dealer license to any applicant who has failed to pay any assessment due under the provisions of this chapter.

[ 2000 c 144 s 13; 1971 ex.s. c 33 s 10.]